Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Economic Development Road Projects

175.750.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky determines as a legislative finding of fact that the economy of the Commonwealth and the consequent economic development potential of the citizens of the Commonwealth are vitally dependent upon the existence and availability of a statewide system of safe, adequate and well-maintained highways, roads and thoroughfares; that there is a serious need for construction, reconstruction, and in some cases relocation of many such highways, roads and thoroughfares to preserve and enhance the economic well-being and development of the Commonwealth and the health and safety of the public; and that in many cases, highways, roads and thoroughfares which are vital economic links between various sections of the Commonwealth have become, by reason of age and continued usage obsolete and are no longer capable of affording the services required in a modern industrial society. The General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky further determines as a legislative finding of fact that the construction, reconstruction, and relocation of a system of such economic development roads through the Turnpike Authority of Kentucky will preserve and enhance the economic viability of the Commonwealth, will enable the Commonwealth to prosper and make available its economic potentials to the fullest possible degree, will protect and enhance the safety, health, convenience and welfare of the traveling public and will therefore constitute the performance of essential governmental and public purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 393, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.

175.760.
Definitions for KRS 175.750 to 175.810.

As used in KRS

175.750

to

175.810

, and as applied to the financing of construction, reconstruction, resurfacing, and relocation of economic development roads by the Turnpike Authority of Kentucky, the following words and phrases shall have the following respective meanings unless another or different meaning or intent shall be clearly indicated by the context.

“Authority” shall mean the Turnpike Authority of Kentucky duly organized and existing pursuant to the provisions of KRS

175.410

to

175.690

, inclusive.

“Bonds” or “economic development road revenue bonds” shall mean economic development road revenue bonds of the authority issued under the provisions of KRS

175.780

. No bonds may be issued for terms exceeding twenty-five (25) years.

“Cabinet” shall mean the Transportation Cabinet of Kentucky or, if said cabinet shall be abolished, the cabinet, board, bureau, body or commission succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to whom the powers vested in the cabinet shall be given or transferred by law.

“Economic development road project” or “project” shall mean the construction, reconstruction, or relocation of any highway, road, or thoroughfare or such part or parts thereof as shall have been designated by the cabinet to constitute a part of the economic development road system of the Commonwealth, which project may include the construction, reconstruction, repair, or relocation of highways, roads, thoroughfares, bridges, tunnels, overpasses, underpasses, interchanges, approaches, and connecting highways.

“Notes” shall mean any economic development road revenue bond anticipation notes, or any economic development road revenue notes. Revenue bond anticipation notes shall be payable from the proceeds of bonds, renewal notes, or income and revenues derived from the leasing by the authority of any project or projects to the cabinet. Revenue notes shall be payable solely from income and revenues derived from the leasing by the authority of any project or projects to the cabinet. Notes may be issued for terms not to exceed five (5) years.

All words and phrases which are defined and used in KRS

175.410

to

175.690

and

175.990

, inclusive, shall have the same meaning or meanings when used in KRS

175.750

to

175.810

, except that the words and phrases “turnpike project” or “project” as used in said identified sections shall mean and refer to economic development road projects constructed and financed pursuant to KRS

175.750

to

175.810

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 393, § 2, effective July 15, 1980.

175.770.
Power of turnpike authority to construct economic development road projects.

Subject to the provisions of KRS

175.640

to

175.690

, the Turnpike Authority of Kentucky may initiate, plan, implement, acquire, construct and finance economic development road projects utilizing and employing all of the authority, rights and procedures granted to the authority by KRS

175.410

to

175.690

, inclusive.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 393, § 3, effective July 15, 1980.

175.780.
Power of turnpike authority to issue economic development road revenue bonds and notes.

To provide for the construction, reconstruction, and relocation of economic development road projects, the authority is hereby authorized and empowered, subject to the limitations contained in a branch budget bill as defined in KRS

48.010

, under and pursuant to the terms and provisions of a written agreement or agreements with the cabinet, to construct, reconstruct, relocate, finance, and operate economic development road projects, to lease such projects to the cabinet, and to issue economic development road revenue bonds or notes of the authority to finance such projects. In the planning, construction, and financing of any economic development road project, the authority and the cabinet shall, subject to the provisions of KRS

175.750

to

175.810

, have and use all authority, procedures, and rights provided by the provisions of KRS

175.410

to

175.690

, inclusive.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 393, § 4, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 450, § 74, effective July 1, 1983; 1990, ch. 502, § 1, effective April 11, 1990; 1990, ch. 507, § 24, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 387, § 27, effective July 15, 1994; 2009, ch. 78, § 39, effective June 25, 2009.

175.790.
Bonds secured solely by revenues derived from leasing project to cabinet — Tolls prohibited.

In the event that the authority and the cabinet shall undertake the planning and financing of any economic development road project, it shall be provided in connection with such financing that economic development road revenue bonds or notes issued in respect of any such project shall be secured solely by income and revenues derived from the leasing by the authority of any such project to the cabinet, and no tolls shall be imposed or charged for the use by the traveling public of any such projects or for amortization of the bonds or notes; provided that notes may be issued in anticipation of the issuance of bonds or renewal notes and be made payable from the proceeds thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 393, § 5, effective July 15, 1980.

175.800.
Funds credited to state transportation fund (road fund) to be used for lease rental payments.

Funds credited to the state transportation fund (road fund) shall be used for the purposes of paying the annual lease rental payments to the Kentucky Turnpike Authority for economic development road projects. Any funds deposited to the credit of the transportation fund (road fund) in excess of the amount required for any such annual lease payments shall be used for any lawful purposes of the transportation fund (road fund).

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 393, § 6, effective July 15, 1980.

175.810.
Economic development road account — Transfer of funds to account.

The Transportation Cabinet shall certify to the commissioner of the Department of Revenue by October 1 of each fiscal year the amount required for lease rental payments to the Kentucky Turnpike Authority for economic development road projects. Upon receiving such certification, the commissioner of the Department of Revenue shall cause said amount to be deposited from road fund receipts to the credit of the economic development road account, hereby created, in the transportation fund (road fund). Such taxes collected in excess of the amount required to be deposited to the economic development road account in the transportation fund (road fund) shall be deposited by the Department of Revenue to the credit of the transportation fund (road fund).

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 393, § 7, effective July 15, 1980; 2005, ch. 85, § 603, effective June 20, 2005.